apertium-eo-en.eo.dix
    <pardef n="verb__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>as</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>is</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>os</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>us</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>us</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>ita</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ita</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itaj</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itan</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itajn</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>onta</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ontaj</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inta</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp3"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inta</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>intaj</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ante</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ante</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerpast"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l> 
        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Barcelona__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="United_States__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Mark__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Mary__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Stevenson__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l> 
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="CX__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="one__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="two__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>cent</l> 
        <r><b/>cent<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>mil</l> 
        <r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>cent</l> 
        <r><b/>cent<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>mil</l> 
        <r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>cent</l> 
        <r><b/>cent<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>mil</l> 
        <r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="million__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="twenty__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="two__num"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>unu</l> 
        <r><b/>unu</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="two__num"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>du</l> 
        <r><b/>du</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="two__num"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>tri</l> 
        <r><b/>tri</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="two__num"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>kvar</l> 
        <r><b/>kvar</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="two__num"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>kvin</l> 
        <r><b/>kvin</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="two__num"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>ses</l> 
        <r><b/>ses</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="two__num"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>sep</l> 
        <r><b/>sep</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="two__num"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>ok</l> 
        <r><b/>ok</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="two__num"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>nay</l> 
        <r><b/>nay</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="two__num"/> 
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/o__vaŭ">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>o</l> 
        <r>o<s n="vbdo"/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oes</l> 
        <r>o<s n="vbdo"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>id</l> 
        <r>o<s n="vbdo"/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="prsubj__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>mi</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>vi</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e c="para las reglas de agradar del t2x, por el momento">
      <p>
        <l>li</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>li</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>sxi</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ŝi</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>gxi</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ĝi</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ni</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ili</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="si__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

    <e lm="prsubj"><i/><par n="prsubj__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="Argentino">
        <i>Argentino</i> 
        <par n="Barcelona__np"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Bogoto">
        <i>Bogoto</i> 
        <par n="Barcelona__np"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Ĉilio">
        <i>Ĉilio</i> 
        <par n="Barcelona__np"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Davido">
        <i>Davido</i> 
        <par n="Mark__np"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Eleonora">
        <i>Eleonora</i> 
        <par n="Mary__np"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Eliza">
        <i>Eliza</i> 
        <par n="Mary__np"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Emilio">
        <i>Emilio</i> 
        <par n="Mark__np"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Eŭrop">
        <i>E</i><par n="ŭ"/><i>rop</i> 
        <par n="Barcelona__np"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Georgo">
        <i>Georgo</i> 
        <par n="Mark__np"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Gvineo">
        <i>Gvineo</i> 
        <par n="Barcelona__np"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Helena">
        <i>Helena</i> 
        <par n="Mary__np"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Henriko">
        <i>Henriko</i> 
        <par n="Mark__np"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Ilza">
        <i>Ilza</i> 
        <par n="Mary__np"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Italio">
        <i>Italio</i> 
        <par n="Barcelona__np"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Izabela">
        <i>Izabela</i> 
        <par n="Mary__np"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Jesuo">
        <i>Jesuo</i> 
        <par n="Mark__np"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Julia">
        <i>Julia</i> 
        <par n="Mary__np"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Ĵeromo">
        <i>Ĵeromo</i> 
        <par n="Mark__np"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Kubo">
        <i>Kubo</i> 
        <par n="Barcelona__np"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Laŭrenco">
        <i>La</i><par n="ŭ"/><i>renco</i> 
        <par n="Mark__np"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Maria">
        <i>Maria</i> 
        <par n="Mary__np"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Marta">
        <i>Marta</i> 
        <par n="Mary__np"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Marteno">
        <i>Marteno</i> 
        <par n="Mark__np"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Monako">
        <i>Monako</i> 
        <par n="Barcelona__np"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Petro">
        <i>Petro</i> 
        <par n="Mark__np"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Romo">
        <i>Romo</i> 
        <par n="Barcelona__np"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Suzana">
        <i>Suzana</i> 
        <par n="Mary__np"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Tanzanio">
        <i>Tanzanio</i> 
        <par n="Barcelona__np"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="apliki">
        <i>aplik</i> 
        <par n="verb__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ĉifi">
        <par n="ĉ"/>
        <i>if</i> 
        <par n="verb__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="dek">
        <i>dek</i> 
        <par n="two__num"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="dividi">
        <i>divid</i> 
        <par n="verb__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="enplanti">
        <i>enplant</i> 
        <par n="verb__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="fosi">
        <i>fos</i> 
        <par n="verb__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="inspekti">
        <i>inspekt</i> 
        <par n="verb__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="kuri">
        <i>kur</i> 
        <par n="verb__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="mil">
        <i>mil</i> 
        <par n="two__num"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="miliono">
        <i>miliono</i> 
        <par n="two__num"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="nulo">
        <i>nulo</i> 
        <par n="two__num"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="operacii">
        <i>operaci</i> 
        <par n="verb__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="reflekti">
        <i>reflekt</i> 
        <par n="verb__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ŝerci">
        <par n="ŝ"/>
        <i>erc</i> 
        <par n="verb__vblex"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="Henry"><i>Henry</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Stevenson"><i>Stevenson</i><par n="Stevenson__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Jekyll"><i>Jekyll</i><par n="Stevenson__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Hyde"><i>Hyde</i><par n="Stevenson__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Lanyon"><i>Lanyon</i><par n="Stevenson__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Utterson"><i>Utterson</i><par n="Stevenson__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Poole"><i>Poole</i><par n="Stevenson__np"/></e>
